Louisiana, session 2026, HB703.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:261 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§261. Authority to prohibit use of road
A. The department may prohibit the operation of vehicles upon any highway
of this state or impose restrictions as to the weight of vehicles to be operated upon
any highway whenever any such highway, because of its substandard condition or
because of deterioration, rain, snow, or other climatic conditions, or construction
thereof, or because of traffic conditions thereon, will be seriously damaged or
destroyed, or the public endangered by the use of vehicles thereon unless such use
is prohibited or the permissible weights thereof reduced.
B. The department shall issue a notice on the official Department of
Transportation and Development website and mail notice of the closure to addresses
within five hundred feet of road closures resulting from the authority granted in
Subsection A of this Section, unless the road closure is caused by a traffic collision,
medical emergency, or serious road hazard.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-377 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 703